Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 223.24, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Account; appropriation. (a) Money in the grain indemnity account, including interest, is appropriated to the commissioner to pay valid claims and to administer this section. (b) The commissioner shall direct payments from the grain indemnity account only for the following purposes: (1) the payment of valid claims; (2) the payment of grain indemnity premium refunds; (3) the payment of administrative expenses under paragraph (c); (4) the payment of legal fees and legal expenses under subdivision 7; or (5) the payment of a trustee appointed under subdivision 6. (c) The commissioner shall allocate money from the grain indemnity account to a separate administrative expenses account to pay or reimburse the agency for grain indemnity account expenses. Administrative expenses under this paragraph include the actual cost of processing payments and refunds, enforcement, record keeping, ordinary management and investment fees connected with the operation of the grain indemnity account, and legal expenses. new text begin (d) Money from the grain indemnity account must not be transferred unless the grain indemnity account contains more than $15,000,000. new text end